Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1036.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act may be known and cited as the “Oklahoma Triage, Treat,
and Transport to Alternative Destination Act”.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6060.11c of Title 36, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this act:


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1036 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. “9-1-1 call” means a communication made on behalf of an
enrollee indicating that the enrollee may need emergency medical
services;
2. a. “Alternative destination” means a lower-acuity
facility that provides medical services, including,
but not limited to:
(1) a Federally Qualified Health Center,
(2) an urgent care center,
(3) a physician’s office or medical clinic, or
(4) a behavioral or mental health care facility,
including, but not limited to, a crisis
stabilization unit and a diversion center.
b. Alternative destination does not include:
(1) a dialysis center,
(2) a hospital,
(3) a private residence, or
(4) a skilled nursing facility;
3. “Ambulance service” has the same meaning as provided by
Section 1-2503 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
4. “Enrollee” means an individual who is covered by any health
benefit plan; and
5. “Health benefit plan” means any such policy as provided by
Section 4405.1 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1036 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. On and after January 1, 2026, any insurer that offers,
issues, or renews a health benefit plan in this state shall provide
coverage for:
1. Services provided by an ambulance service provider to:
a. treat an enrollee in place, or
b. triage, treat, or transport an enrollee to an
alternative destination; and
2. An encounter between an ambulance service and enrollee that
results in no transport of the enrollee.
C. The coverage under this section:
1. Is subject to the initiation of ambulance service treatment
as a result of a 9-1-1 call that is documented in the records of the
ambulance service;
2. Is subject to health benefit plan deductibles or copayment
requirements;
3. Does not diminish or limit benefits otherwise allowable
under a health benefit plan, even if the billing claims for medical
or behavioral health services overlap in time that is billed by the
ambulance service that is also providing care; and
4. Is subject to any health benefit plan provision that applies
to other services covered by the health benefit plan.
D. The reimbursement rate for an ambulance service whose
operators triage, treat, and transport an enrollee to an alternative
destination shall not be less than the minimum allowable
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1036 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

reim bursement rate for advanced life support with mileage to the
scene.
E. This act shall apply to all contracts subject to this
section that are entered into or renewed on or after January 1,
2026.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON BUSINESS AND INSURANCE
March 6, 2025 - DO PASS

















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1036 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)